Missouri, session 2026, HB2052.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 79.020, 79.050, 79.060, 79.070, 79.090, 79.100, 79.110, 79.120,
79.135, 79.140, 79.150, 79.160, 79.165, 79.180, 79.210, 79.230, 79.240, 79.260, 79.270,
79.280, 79.300, 79.310, 79.320, 79.330, 79.340, 79.350, 79.360, 79.365, 79.370, 79.380,
79.390, 79.400, 79.410, 79.430, 79.440, 79.450, 79.460, 79.470, and 79.552, RSMo, and
section 79.130 as enacted by senate bill no. 672, ninety-seventh general assembly, second
regular session, and section 79.130 as enacted by house bill no. 1435, eighty-fourth general
assembly, second regular session, are repealed and forty new sections enacted in lieu thereof,
to be known as sections 79.020, 79.050, 79.060, 79.070, 79.085, 79.090, 79.100, 79.110,
79.120, 79.130, 79.140, 79.150, 79.160, 79.165, 79.180, 79.210, 79.230, 79.240, 79.260,
79.270, 79.280, 79.300, 79.310, 79.320, 79.330, 79.340, 79.350, 79.360, 79.365, 79.370,
79.380, 79.390, 79.400, 79.410, 79.430, 79.440, 79.450, 79.460, 79.470, and 79.552, to read
as follows:
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2052 2
79.020. The mayor and board of [aldermen] alders of such city, whether the same
shall have been incorporated before becoming a city of the fourth class or not, with the
consent of a majority of the voters of such city voting on the question, shall have power to
extend the limits of the city over territory adjacent thereto, and to diminish the limits of the
city by excluding territory therefrom, and shall, in every case, have power, with the consent of
the voters as aforesaid, to extend or diminish the city limits in such manner as in their
judgment and discretion may redound to the benefit of the city.
79.050. 1. The following officers shall be elected by the qualified voters of the city,
and shall hold office for the term of two years, except as otherwise provided in this section,
and until their successors are elected and qualified, to wit: mayor and board of [aldermen]
alders. No person shall hold office as either mayor or an alder for more than eight
years. The board of [aldermen] alders may provide by ordinance, after the approval of a
majority of the voters voting at an election at which the issue is submitted, for the
appointment of a collector and for the appointment of a chief of police, who shall perform all
duties required of the marshal by law, and any other police officers found by the board of
[aldermen] alders to be necessary for the good government of the city. The marshal or chief
of police shall be twenty-one years of age or older. If the board of [aldermen] aldersdoes not
provide for the appointment of a chief of police and collector as provided by this section, a
city marshal, who shall be twenty-one years of age or older, and collector shall be elected, and
the board of [aldermen] aldersmay provide by ordinance that the same person may be elected
marshal and collector, at the same election, and hold both offices and the board of [aldermen]
alders may provide by ordinance for the election of city assessor, city attorney, city clerk and
street commissioner, who shall hold their respective offices for a term of two years and until
their successors shall be elected or appointed and qualified, except that the term of the city
marshal shall be four years.
2. The board of [aldermen] alders may provide by ordinance, after the approval of a
majority of the voters voting thereon at the next municipal election at which the issue is
submitted, that the term of the collector shall be four years and the term of the mayor shall be
two, three, or four years. Any person elected as collector after the passage of such an
ordinance shall serve for a term of four years and until [his] a successor is elected and
qualified. Any person elected as mayor after the passage of such ordinance shall serve for a
term of two, three, or four years, as provided, and until [his] a successor is elected and
qualified.
3. The board of [aldermen] alders may provide by ordinance that the term of the
board of [aldermen] alders shall be four years. Such ordinance shall be submitted by the
board to the voters of the city and shall take effect only upon the approval of a majority of the
voters voting at an election at which the issue is submitted. Any person elected to the board

HB 2052 3
of [aldermen] alders after the passage of such an ordinance shall serve for a term of four
years and until [his] a successor is elected and qualified.
79.060. 1. The board of [aldermen] alders shall, by ordinance, divide the city into
not less than two wards, and two [aldermen] alders shall be elected from each ward by the
qualified voters thereof, at the first election for [aldermen] alders in cities adopting the
provisions of this chapter. At such election for [aldermen] alders, the person receiving the
highest number of votes in each ward shall hold [his] office for two years, and the person
receiving the next highest number of votes shall hold [his] office for one year; but thereafter
each ward shall elect annually one [alderman] alder, who shall hold [his] office for two years.
2. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 1 of this section, cities with a
population of one thousand or less in the most recent census may, by ordinance, choose to
elect [aldermen] alders at large instead of by the method outlined in subsection 1 of this
section. Under this option, the seats of [aldermen] aldersshall be filled at large as soon as the
current terms expire. Each year thereafter, one-half of the board of [aldermen] alders shall
stand for election at large for a two-year term.
79.070. No person shall be an [alderman] alder unless he or she is at least eighteen
years of age, a citizen of the United States, and an inhabitant and resident of the city for one
year next preceding his or her election, and a resident, at the time he or she files and during
the time he or she serves, of the ward from which he or she is elected.
79.085. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the offices of
mayor and alder in a city of the fourth classification shall be uncompensated, except for
a monthly stipend, and shall not be eligible for employment benefits. As used in this
section, "employment benefits" has the same definition as in section 290.528.
79.090. The board shall elect one of their own number who shall be styled "acting
president of the board of [aldermen] alders" and who shall serve for a term of one year.
79.100. When any vacancy shall happen in the office of mayor by death, resignation,
removal from the city, removal from office, refusal to qualify, or from any other cause
whatever, the acting president of the board of [aldermen] alders shall, for the time being,
perform the duties of mayor, with all the rights, privileges, powers and jurisdiction of the
mayor, until such vacancy be filled or such disability be removed; or, in case of temporary
absence, until the mayor's return.
79.110. The mayor and board of [aldermen] alders of each city governed by this
chapter shall have the care, management and control of the city and its finances, and shall
have power to enact and ordain any and all ordinances not repugnant to the constitution and
laws of this state, and such as they shall deem expedient for the good government of the city,
the preservation of peace and good order, the benefit of trade and commerce and the health of

HB 2052 4
the inhabitants thereof, and such other ordinances, rules and regulations as may be deemed
necessary to carry such powers into effect, and to alter, modify or repeal the same.
79.120. 1. The mayor shall have a seat in and preside over the board of [aldermen]
alders, but shall not vote on any question except a question relating to the adoption of the
city's budget and then only in case of a tie[, nor shall he preside or vote in cases when he is
an interested party. He].
2. The mayorshall exercise [a] general supervision over all the officers and affairs of
the city[,] and shall take care that the ordinances of the city, and the state laws relating to such
city, are complied with.
[79.130. 1. The style of the ordinances of the city shall be: "Be it
ordained by the board of aldermen of the city of ______, as follows:" No
ordinance shall be passed except by bill, and no bill shall become an ordinance
unless on its final passage a majority of the members elected to the board of
aldermen shall vote for it, and the ayes and nays be entered on the journal.
Every proposed ordinance shall be introduced to the board of aldermen in
writing and shall be read by title or in full two times prior to passage, both
readings may occur at a single meeting of the board of aldermen . If the
proposed ordinance is read by title only, copies of the proposed ordinance shall
be made available for public inspection prior to the time the bill is under
consideration by the board of aldermen . No bill shall become an ordinance
until it shall have been signed by the mayor or person exercising the duties of
the mayor's office, or shall have been passed over the mayor's veto, as herein
provided.
2. The provisions of this section shall not apply to ordinances
proposed or passed under section 79.135.]
79.130. The style of the ordinances of the city shall be: "Be it ordained by the board
of [aldermen] aldersof the city of ______, as follows:". No ordinance shall be passed except
by bill, and no bill shall become an ordinance unless on its final passage a majority of the
members elected to the board of [aldermen] alders shall vote for it, and the ayes and nays be
entered on the journal. Every proposed ordinance shall be introduced to the board of
[aldermen] alders in writing and shall be read by title or in full two times prior to passage,
both readings may occur at a single meeting of the board of [aldermen] alders. If the
proposed ordinance is read by title only, copies of the proposed ordinance shall be made
available for public inspection prior to the time the bill is under consideration by the board of
[aldermen] alders. No bill shall become an ordinance until it shall have been signed by the
mayor or person exercising the duties of the mayor's office, or shall have been passed over the
mayor's veto, as herein provided.
79.140. Every bill duly passed by the board of [aldermen] aldersand presented to the
mayor and [by him] approved by the mayor shall become an ordinance, and every bill
presented as aforesaid, but returned with the mayor's objections thereto, shall stand

HB 2052 5
reconsidered. The board of [aldermen] alders shall cause the objections of the mayor to be
entered at large upon the journal, and proceed at its convenience to consider the question
pending, which shall be in this form: "Shall the bill pass, the objections of the mayor thereto
notwithstanding?". The vote on this question shall be taken by ayes and nays and the names
entered upon the journal, and if two-thirds of all the members-elect shall vote in the
affirmative, the city clerk shall certify the fact on the roll, and the bill thus certified shall be
deposited with the proper officer, and shall become an ordinance in the same manner and with
like effect as if it had received the approval of the mayor. The mayor shall have power to sign
or veto any ordinance passed by the board of [aldermen] alders; provided, that should [he]
the mayor neglect or refuse to sign any ordinance and return the same with [his] objections,
in writing, at the next regular meeting of the board of [aldermen] alders, the same shall
become a law without [his] the mayor's signature.
79.150. The board of [aldermen] alders shall cause to be kept a journal of its
proceedings, and the ayes and nays shall be entered on any question at the request of any two
members. The board of [aldermen] alders may prescribe and enforce such rules as it may
find necessary for the expeditious transaction of its business.
79.160. The board of [aldermen] alders shall semiannually each year, at times to be
set by the board of [aldermen] alders, make out and spread upon their records a full and
detailed account and statement of the receipts and expenditures and indebtedness of the city
for the half year ending with the last day of the month immediately preceding the date of such
report, which account and statement shall be published in some newspaper in the city.
79.165. In the event the financial statement of any fourth class city is not published as
required by section 79.160, the treasurer of such city shall not pay out any money of the city
on any warrant or order of the board of [aldermen] alders after the end of the month in which
such financial statement should have been published until such time as such financial
statement is published. Any treasurer violating the provisions of this section shall be deemed
guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
79.180. The board of [aldermen] alders shall have power to compel the attendance of
witnesses and the production of papers and records relating to any subject under consideration
in which the interest of the city is involved, and shall have power to call on the proper officers
of the city, or of the county in which such city is located, to execute such process. The officer
making such service shall be allowed to receive therefor such fees as are allowed by law in
the circuit court for similar services, to be paid by the city. The mayor or acting president of
the board of [aldermen] alders shall have power to administer oaths to witnesses.
79.210. The mayor shall, from time to time, communicate to the board of [aldermen]
alders such measures as may, in [his] the mayor's opinion, tend to the improvement of the
finances, the police, health, security, ornament, comfort and general prosperity of the city.

HB 2052 6
79.230. The mayor, with the consent and approval of the majority of the members of
the board of [aldermen] alders, shall have power to appoint a treasurer, city attorney, city
assessor, street commissioner, [and night watchman] security guard, and such other officers
as [he] the mayor may be authorized by ordinance to appoint[, and]. If deemed for the best
interests of the city, the mayor and board of [aldermen] alders may, by ordinance, employ
special counsel to represent the city, either in a case of a vacancy in the office of city attorney
or to assist the city attorney, and pay reasonable compensation therefor[, and]. The person
elected marshal may be appointed to and hold the office of street commissioner. The mayor
shall not appoint any person who, directly or through an entity, contributed to the
mayor's campaign for the current term of office. An alder shall not vote to approve any
person who, directly or through an entity, contributed to the alder's campaign for the
current term of office.
79.240. 1. The mayor may, with the consent of a majority of all the members elected
to the board of [aldermen] alders, remove from office, for cause shown, any elective officer
of the city, such officer being first given opportunity, together with [his] witnesses, to be
heard before the board of [aldermen] alders sitting as a board of impeachment. Any elective
officer, including the mayor, may in like manner, for cause shown, be removed from office by
a two-thirds vote of all members elected to the board of [aldermen] alders, independently of
the mayor's approval or recommendation. The mayor may, with the consent of a majority of
all the members elected to the board of [aldermen] alders, remove from office any appointive
officer of the city at will, and any such appointive officer may be so removed by a two-thirds
vote of all the members elected to the board of [aldermen] alders, independently of the
mayor's approval or recommendation. The board of [aldermen] alders may pass ordinances
regulating the manner of impeachments and removals.
2. Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize the mayor, with the consent
of the majority of all the members elected to the board of [aldermen] alders, or the board of
[aldermen] alders by a two-thirds vote of all its members, to remove or discharge any chief,
as that term is defined in section 106.273.
79.260. Every officer of the city and his or her assistants, and every [alderman]
alder, before entering upon the duties of his or her office, shall take and subscribe to an oath
or affirmation before some court of record in the county, or the city clerk, that he or she
possesses all the qualifications prescribed for his or her office by law; that he or she will
support the Constitution of the United States and of the state of Missouri, the provisions of all
laws of this state affecting cities of this class, and the ordinances of the city, and faithfully
demean himself or herself while in office; which official oath or affirmation shall be filed
with the city clerk. Every officer of the corporation, when required by law or ordinance,
shall, within fifteen days after his or her appointment or election, and before entering upon

HB 2052 7
the discharge of the duties of his or her office, give bond to the city in such sum and with
such sureties as may be designated by ordinance, conditioned upon the faithful performance
of his or her duty, and that he or she will pay over all moneys belonging to the city, as
provided by law, that may come into his or her hands. If any person elected or appointed to
any office shall fail to take and subscribe such oath or affirmation, or to give bond as herein
required, his or her office shall be deemed vacant. For any breach of condition of any such
bond, suit may be instituted thereon by the city, or by any person in the name of the city to the
use of such person.
79.270. The board of [aldermen] alders shall have power to fix the compensation of
all the officers and employees of the city, by ordinance. But the salary of an officer shall not
be changed during the time for which he or she was elected or appointed.
79.280. If a vacancy occurs in any elective office, the mayor or the person exercising
the duties of the mayor shall cause a special meeting of the board of [aldermen] alders to
convene where a successor to the vacant office shall be selected by appointment by the mayor
with the advice and consent of a majority of the remaining members of the board of
[aldermen] alders. If the vacancy is in the office of mayor, nominations of a successor may
be made by any member of the board of [aldermen] alders and selected with the consent of a
majority of the members of the board of [aldermen] alders. The board of [aldermen] alders
may adopt procedures to fill vacancies consistent with this section. The successor shall serve
until the next regular municipal election. If a vacancy occurs in any office not elective, the
mayor shall appoint a suitable person to discharge the duties of such office until the first
regular meeting of the board of [aldermen] aldersthereafter, at which time such vacancy shall
be permanently filled.
79.300. The treasurer shall receive and safely keep all moneys, warrants, books,
bonds and obligations entrusted to his or her care, and shall pay over all moneys, bonds or
other obligations of the city on warrants or orders, duly drawn, passed or ordered by the board
of [aldermen] alders, and signed by the mayor and attested by the city clerk, and having the
seal of the city affixed thereto, and not otherwise; and shall perform such other duties as may
be required of him or her by ordinance. Before entering upon the duties of his or her office,
he or she shall give bond in such sum as may be required by ordinance.
79.310. The collector shall, annually, at such times as may be designated by
ordinance, make a detailed report to the board of [aldermen] alders, stating the various
moneys collected by him or her during the year, and the amounts uncollected and the names
of the persons from which he or she failed to collect and the causes therefor.
79.320. The board of [aldermen] alders shall elect a clerk for such board, to be
known as "the city clerk", whose duties and term of office shall be fixed by ordinance. No
alder shall vote to elect any person who, directly or through an entity, contributed to the

HB 2052 8
alder's campaign for the current term of office. Among other things, the city clerk shall
keep a journal of the proceedings of the board of [aldermen] alders. He or she shall safely
and properly keep all the records and papers belonging to the city which may be entrusted to
his or her care; he or she shall be the general accountant of the city; he or she is hereby
empowered to administer official oaths and oaths to persons certifying to demands or claims
against the city.
79.330. The board of [aldermen] alders may by ordinance provide that hereafter the
same person shall hold the offices of marshal and collector, in which case his or her official
title shall be "marshal and ex officio collector".
79.340. It shall be the duty of all the officers of the city to report annually to the board
of [aldermen] alders, such reports to embrace a full statement of the receipts and
expenditures of their respective offices, and such other matters as may be required by the
board of [aldermen] alders, by ordinance, resolution or otherwise.
79.350. The mayor or board of [aldermen] alders shall have power, as often as [he]
the mayor or [they] the board may deem it necessary, to require any officer of the city to
exhibit his or her accounts or other papers or records[,] and to make report to the board of
[aldermen] alders, in writing, touching any matter relating to his or her office.
79.360. Any member of the board of [aldermen] alders or officer of the city who
shall, in official capacity, or under color of his or her office, knowingly or willfully or
corruptly vote or assent to, or report in favor of or allow or certify for allowance, any claim or
demand against the city, which claim or demand shall be on account of or under color of a
contract or agreement not authorized by law and the ordinances of the city, shall be deemed
guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall, upon conviction thereof, be punished by imprisonment in
the county jail for not more than one year or by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars, or
by both such fine and imprisonment.
79.365. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, in all cities of the
fourth class, the board of [alderpersons] alders shall have the authority to fix the
compensation, not to exceed two hundred dollars per month, of members of the planning and
zoning commission, the board of adjustment, the park board and the board of police
commissioners of the city by ordinance.
79.370. The board of [aldermen] alders shall have power, by ordinance, to secure the
general health of the inhabitants of the city by any measure to regulate, suppress and abate
slaughterhouses, slaughtering animals, stockyards, soap and other factories, pig pens, cow
stables, and other stables and dairies, and to remove the same, and to regulate or prevent the
carrying on of any business which may be dangerous or detrimental to the public health, or
the manufacturing or rendering of articles obnoxious to the health of the inhabitants; and to
pass ordinances for the prevention of nuisances and their abatement.

HB 2052 9
79.380. The board of [aldermen] alders may make regulations and pass ordinances
for the prevention of the introduction of contagious diseases in the city, and for the abatement
of the same, and may make quarantine laws and enforce the same within five miles of the city.
They may purchase or condemn and hold for the city, within or without the city limits, or
within ten miles therefrom, all necessary lands for hospital purposes, waterworks, sewer
carriage and outfall, and erect, establish and regulate hospitals, workhouses, poorhouses,
airports and provide for the government and support of the same, and make regulations to
secure the general health of the city, and to prevent and remove nuisances; except that the
condemnation of any property outside of the city limits shall be regulated in all respects as the
condemnation of property for railroad purposes is regulated by law. The police jurisdiction of
the city shall extend over such land and property to the same extent as over other city
property, as provided in this chapter.
79.390. The board of [aldermen] alders may establish, alter and change the channel
of watercourses, and wall them and cover them over, and prevent obstructions thereon, and
may establish, make and regulate public wells, cisterns and reservoirs of water, and provide
for filling the same. The board of [aldermen] alders may purchase grounds and erect and
establish market houses and marketplaces, and regulate and govern the same, and also
contract with any person or persons, association or corporation, for the erection, maintenance
and regulation of market houses, and marketplaces, on such terms and conditions and in such
manner as the board of [aldermen] alders may prescribe. They may also provide for the
erection, purchase or renting of the city hall, workhouse, houses of correction, prisons, engine
houses, and any and all other necessary buildings for the city, and may sell, lease, abolish or
otherwise dispose of the same, and may enclose, improve, regulate, purchase or sell all public
parks or other public grounds belonging to the city, and may purchase and hold grounds for
public parks within the city, or within three miles thereof.
79.400. 1. The board of [aldermen] aldersmay prescribe limits within the city within
which no lumberyard or woodyard shall be kept, and may regulate, restrain or prohibit the
erection or maintenance of any fence composed in whole or in part of barbed wire, along or
adjacent to any public street, avenue, alley, park, lane, cemetery or other public grounds.
2. The board of [aldermen] alders may also regulate or prohibit the running at large
of cattle, hogs, horses, mules, sheep, goats and all other domestic animals, also geese, ducks,
chickens, turkeys and all other domestic fowls and cause such animals or fowls as may be
running at large to be impounded and sold in such manner and at such time as may be
prescribed by ordinance.
3. They may also provide penalties for the owners or keepers who shall permit such
animals or fowls to be at large.

HB 2052 10
4. The board of [aldermen] alders may also provide for the erection of all needful
pounds, pens and buildings for the use of the city, within or without the city limits, and
appoint and compensate keepers thereof and establish and enforce rules governing the same.
5. The board of [aldermen] alders may also tax, regulate and restrain and prohibit the
running at large of dogs, and provide for their destruction when at large contrary to ordinance,
and impose penalties on the owners or keepers thereof.
79.410. The board of [aldermen] alders may prohibit and prevent all encroachments
into and upon sidewalks, streets, avenues, alleys and other public places of the city, and may
provide for the removal of obstructions from the sidewalks, curbstones, gutters and
crosswalks, at the expense of the owners or occupants of the ground fronting thereon, or at the
expense of the person causing the same[; they]. The board of alders may also regulate the
planting of shade trees, erecting of awnings, hitching posts, lamp posts, awning posts,
telephone, telegraph and electric light poles, and making of excavations through and under
the sidewalks or in any public street, avenue, alley or other public place within the city.
[They] The board of alders may prevent and punish for all [horseracing] horse racing, or
other racing, fast riding or driving or training in the streets, highways, avenues, alleys, or over
bridges or through tunnels in the city, and all games, practices or amusements therein likely to
result in damage to any person or property, and to regulate, prevent and punish for the riding,
driving, leading, standing, hitching or passing of horses, mules, oxen or other teams or stock
or animals or any vehicle over or upon or across or along any sidewalk, street, avenue or alley
of the city.
79.430. The board of [aldermen] alders shall have power to purchase, receive, and to
hold real estate, as herein mentioned, for public cemeteries, either within or without the city,
within a distance of three miles thereof, and the city and its officers shall have jurisdiction
over the said cemeteries wherever located; provided, that no such cemetery shall exceed
eighty acres in one body. The board of [aldermen] alders shall provide for the survey,
platting, grading, fencing, ornamenting and improving of all the cemetery ground, and the
avenues leading thereto, owned by the city, and may construct walks and protect ornamental
trees, and provide for paying the expenses therefor. The board of [aldermen] alders may
make rules and pass ordinances imposing penalties and fines, regulating, protecting and
governing city cemeteries, the owners of lots therein, visitors thereto, and punish trespassers
therein, and the officers of such city shall have as full jurisdiction and power in the enforcing
of such rules and ordinances as though they related to the city itself.
79.440. The cemetery lots shall be conveyed by certificates, signed by the mayor,
countersigned by the clerk, under the seal of the city, specifying that the purchaser to whom
the same is issued is the owner of the lot described therein by numbers, as laid down upon the
official map or plat of such cemetery made by the city, for the purpose of interment, and such

HB 2052 11
certificate shall vest in the purchaser, his or her heirs or assigns, a right in fee simple to such
lots, for the sole purpose of interment, under the regulations of the board of [aldermen]
alders. Such certificates shall be entitled to be recorded in the office of recorder of deeds of
the proper county without further acknowledgment, and such description of lots shall be
deemed and recognized as sufficient description thereof. The board of [aldermen] aldersmay
limit the number of lots owned by the same person at the same time, and may prescribe rules
for enclosing, adorning and erecting monuments, tombstones and ornaments on cemetery lots,
and prohibit any improper adornment thereof; but no religious test shall be made to the
ownership of the lots, or the burials had therein, or for the ornamentation of graves or lots.
79.450. 1. The board of [aldermen] alders shall enact ordinances to prohibit and
suppress houses of prostitution and other disorderly houses and practices, including gambling
and gambling houses, and all kinds of public indecencies, and may prohibit the selling or
giving of intoxicating liquors to any minor or habitual drunkard.
2. The board of [aldermen] alders shall also enact ordinances to restrain and prohibit
riots, noises, assaults and batteries, disturbances of the peace, disturbances of religious and
other lawful assemblies, indecent shows, exhibitions or concerts in any street, house or place
in the city, disorderly assemblies, and to regulate, restrain and prevent the discharge of
firearms, and the keeping and discharge of rockets, powder, fireworks or other dangerous
combustible materials in the streets or in limits of the city.
3. The board of [aldermen] alders may also regulate and control the construction of
buildings, the construction and cleaning of fireplaces, chimneys, stoves and stovepipes,
ovens, boilers, kettles, forges or any apparatus used in any building, manufactory or business
which may be dangerous in causing or promoting fires, and may provide for the inspection of
the same.
4. The board of [aldermen] aldersmay also provide by ordinance limits within which
no building shall be constructed except of brick or stone or other incombustible materials,
with fireproof roofs, and impose a penalty for the violation of such ordinance, and may cause
buildings commenced, put up or removed into such limits in violation of such ordinance, to be
removed or abated.
5. The board of [aldermen] alders may also purchase fire engines, hook and ladder
outfits, hose and hose carts, buckets and all other apparatus useful in the extinguishing of
fires, and organize fire companies and prescribe rules of duty for the government thereof,
with such penalties for the violation thereof as they may deem proper, and not exceeding one
hundred dollars and to make all necessary expenditures for the purchase of such fire apparatus
and the payment of such fire companies.
6. The board of [aldermen] alders may enact or make all ordinances, rules and
regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

HB 2052 12
7. The board of [aldermen] alders may enact or make all ordinances, rules and
regulations, not inconsistent with the laws of the state, expedient for maintaining the peace,
good government and welfare of the city and its trade and commerce.
79.460. The board of [aldermen] alders may adopt ordinances providing for the
prohibition of and punishment for the carrying of concealed deadly weapons, and may also
adopt ordinances providing for the prohibition of vagrancy and providing that upon
conviction one adjudged guilty may be imprisoned, fined or set to work.
79.470. For all ordinance violations the board of [aldermen] alders may impose
penalties not exceeding a fine of five hundred dollars and costs, or ninety days' imprisonment,
or both the fine and imprisonment. Where the city and state have a penalty for the same
offense, the board shall set the same penalty by ordinance as is set by statute, except that
imprisonments, when made under city ordinances, may be in the city prison or workhouse
instead of the county jail.
79.552. 1. In any municipality eligible under section 79.550 to create a municipal
redevelopment authority, upon the motion of the governing body of such municipality, there
is hereby created a municipal redevelopment authority in such municipality, which shall
consist of nine members appointed pursuant to this section. Three members of such authority
shall be appointed by the mayor of such municipality, six members of such authority shall be
appointed by the governor, with the advice and consent of the senate.
2. The members of the authority shall be citizens and residents of the state. The
members of the authority appointed by the mayor shall be residents of the municipality, or
shall have previously been residents of the municipality for at least five years preceding the
appointment. Of the members of the authority appointed by the governor, at least four
members shall be residents of the county in which the municipality is located and such
members may also be residents of the municipality.
3. Each member appointed shall serve for a term of two years, except that of the
members first appointed, two of the members appointed by the mayor and three of the
members appointed by the governor shall serve for a term of one year. The mayor shall
designate one of the members as [chairman] chair. Vacancies in the authority shall be filled
for the unexpired term in the same manner as original appointments are made. Five members
of the authority shall constitute a quorum, and any action or order of the authority shall
require the approval of at least five members.
4. All members shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses incurred by
them in the performance of their duties, except that the reimbursements for expenses incurred
on any one day other than the cost of travel shall not exceed one hundred and fifty percent of
the daily expense allowance established for members of the general assembly pursuant to

HB 2052 13
section 21.145. Any member who is a resident of the county in which the municipality
establishing the authority is located shall not be reimbursed for lodging.
[79.135. 1. In any city of the fourth classification with more than five
thousand but fewer than six thousand inhabitants and located in any county of
the third classification without a township form of government and with more
than sixteen thousand but fewer than eighteen thousand inhabitants, a
proposed ordinance may be submitted to the board of aldermen by petition
signed by at least ten percent of the registered voters voting for mayor at the
last municipal election. The petition shall contain, in addition to the requisite
number of valid signatures, the full text of the ordinance sought to be passed
and a request that the ordinance be submitted to a vote of the people if not
passed by the board of aldermen .
2. The signatures to the petition need not all be appended to one paper,
but each signer shall add to his or her signature his or her place of residence,
giving the street and number. One of the signers of each such paper shall make
oath before an officer competent to administer oaths that the statements therein
made are true as he or she believes and that each signature to the paper
appended is the genuine signature of the person whose name it purports to be.
3. Within ten days from the date of filing such petition, the city clerk
shall examine and ascertain whether the petition is signed by the requisite
number of voters and, if necessary, the board of aldermen shall allow the clerk
extra help for such purpose. The clerk shall attach a certificate of examination
to the petition. If by the clerk's certificate the petition is shown to be
insufficient, the petition may be amended within ten days from the date of the
issuance of the clerk's certificate. The clerk shall, within ten days after such
amendment, make like examination of the amended petition. If the second
certificate shows the petition to be insufficient, the petition shall be returned to
the person filing it, without prejudice to the filing of a new petition to the same
effect. If the petition is deemed to be sufficient, the clerk shall submit it to the
board of aldermen without delay.
4. Upon receipt of the petition and certificate from the clerk, the board
of aldermen shall either:
(1) Pass said ordinance without alteration within twenty days after
attachment of the clerk's certificate to the accompanying petition; or
(2) Submit the question without alteration to the voters at the next
municipal election or, if the petition has been signed by twenty-five percent or
more of the registered voters voting for mayor at the last municipal election,
the board of aldermen shall immediately submit the question without
alteration to the voters of the city.
5. The question shall be submitted in substantially the following form:
Shall the following ordinance be (adopted) (repealed)? (Set out
ordinance)
6. If a majority of the voters vote in favor thereof, such ordinance shall
thereupon become a valid and binding ordinance of the city.
7. Any number of proposed ordinances may be voted upon at the same
election, in accordance with the provisions of this section.

HB 2052 14
8. Any ordinance in effect that was proposed by petition cannot be
repealed except by a vote of the people. The board of aldermen may submit a
proposition for the repeal of any such ordinance or for amendments thereto, to
be voted upon at any municipal election; and should such proposition receive a
majority of the votes cast thereon, such ordinance shall thereby be repealed or
amended accordingly. The board of aldermen may amend an ordinance
proposed by petition without a vote of the people, but the original purpose of
the ordinance may not be changed by such amendment.]
✔